Mississippi, session 2026, SB2879.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 27-53-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-53-15.  (1)  A manufactured home or mobile home shall be considered personal property for purposes of ad valorem taxation unless the manufactured homeowner or mobile homeowner who owns the land on which the manufactured home or mobile home is located either: (a)  Declares at the time of registration that the manufactured home or mobile home shall be classified as real property for ad valorem tax purposes only under subsection (2) of this section; or (b)  Permanently retires the title to real property under Section 63-21-30. (2)  The manufactured homeowner or mobile homeowner who owns the land on which the manufactured home or mobile home is located shall have the option at the time of registration of declaring whether the manufactured home or mobile home shall be classified as personal or real property for ad valorem tax purposes only.  If the manufactured home or mobile home is to be classified as real property for ad valorem tax purposes only, then the wheels and axles must be removed and it must be anchored and blocked in accordance with the rules and procedures promulgated by the Commissioner of Insurance of the State of Mississippi. After the wheels and axles have been removed and the manufactured home or mobile home has been anchored and blocked in accordance with such rules and procedures, the manufactured home or mobile home shall be considered to have been affixed to a permanent foundation.  The county tax assessor shall then enter the manufactured home or mobile home on the land rolls and tax it as real property on the land on which it is located from the date of registration.  At such time, the county tax assessor shall issue a certificate certifying that the manufactured home or mobile home has been classified as real property for ad valorem tax purposes only.  Such certificate shall contain the name of the owner of the manufactured home or mobile home, the name of the manufacturer, the model, the serial number or VIN and the legal description of the real property on which the manufactured home or mobile home is located.  The county tax assessor shall cause such certificate to be filed in the land records of the county in which the property is situated.  After filing, the chancery clerk shall forward the certificate to the owner.  For issuance of the certificate, a fee of Ten Dollars ($10.00) shall be collected by the county tax assessor and retained by the county tax assessor and the county tax assessor shall also collect the applicable fee pursuant to Section 25-7-9(1)(b) for the filing of the certificate and such fee shall be forwarded to the chancery clerk.  Upon the filing of the certificate in the land records, the manufactured home or mobile home shall then be considered real property for purposes of ad valorem taxation only.  The filing of such a certificate shall not affect the validity or priority of any existing perfected lien.  If a manufactured home or mobile home is classified as real property for ad valorem tax purposes only and no certificate of title was required to be issued or issued for such property pursuant to Chapter 21, Title 63, Mississippi Code of 1972, a security interest may be obtained therein through the use of a mortgage or deed of trust describing both the manufactured home or mobile home and the land on which the manufactured home or mobile home is located.  For a manufactured home or mobile home classified as personal property for which no certificate of title was required to be issued or issued pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 21, Title 63, Mississippi Code of 1972, the perfection of a security interest therein shall be governed by the provisions of Chapter 9, Title 75, Mississippi Code of 1972.  Regardless of whether a manufactured home or mobile home for which a certificate of title was required to be issued or issued pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 21, Title 63, Mississippi Code of 1972, is classified as real property for ad valorem tax purposes only or is classified as personal property, the perfection of a security interest therein shall be governed by the provisions of Chapter 21, Title 63, Mississippi Code of 1972.  A manufactured home or mobile home that has been classified as personal property may be reclassified as real property for ad valorem tax purposes only at the option of its owner if the owner obtains a certification from the tax assessor as provided in this section.  Conversely, a manufactured home or mobile home that has been classified as real property for ad valorem tax purposes only may be reclassified for purposes of ad valorem taxation only as personal property at the option of its owner if there is no lien against it and if the owner notifies the county tax assessor to reassess it and have the county tax collector enter it upon the manufactured home rolls.  Upon a request for reclassification, if no certificate of title was required to be issued or issued for the manufactured home or mobile home, there must be no lien against it and the property owner shall present proof satisfactory to the tax assessor that there are no liens outstanding on the property.  If there is a lien against the manufactured home or mobile home, the county tax assessor shall refuse to allow the county tax collector to reclassify it as personal property until the lien has been released.  If a certificate of title as provided in Chapter 21, Title 63, Mississippi Code of 1972, has been issued, the manufactured home or mobile home may be reclassified for ad valorem taxation purposes only regardless of whether a lien exists on the certificate of title.  Upon such request, the tax assessor may issue a certificate cancelling the classification of the manufactured home or mobile home as real property for ad valorem tax purposes only and cause such certification to be filed in the land records of the county in which the property is situated.  For issuance of the certificate, a fee of Ten Dollars ($10.00) shall be collected by the county tax assessor and retained by the county tax assessor and the county tax assessor shall also collect the applicable fee pursuant to Section 25-7-9(1)(b) for the filing of the certificate and such fee shall be forwarded to the chancery clerk. (3)  If the title to a manufactured home or mobile home has been permanently retired to real property under Section 63-21-30, then the county tax assessor shall enter the manufactured home or mobile home on the land rolls and tax it as real property on the land on which it is located from the date of recordation of the affidavit of affixation.  Upon the filing of the affidavit of affixation in the land records, the manufactured home or mobile home shall be considered real property for ad valorem taxation and for all other purposes. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.